California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Certificated Employees [44420. - 44671.]



  ARTICLE 1. Revocation and Suspension of Certification Documents [44420. - 44440.]

44420.

(a) If any person employed by a school district in a position requiring certification qualifications refuses, without good cause, to fulfill a valid contract of employment with the district or leave the service of the district without the consent of the superintendent, if any, or the governing board, of the district except in the manner provided for by law, the commission may, after proof of this fact is made to it, take an adverse action on the credential holder but may not suspend the credential for more than one year or revoke the credential.

(b) If the credentials issued to the person by the commission have been subject to adverse action pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission may, if the credentials again become subject to suspension under this section, suspend the credentials for not more than two years.

(c) The commission shall investigate allegations brought under this section in accordance with Section 44242.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44420.5.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Institution of higher education” has the same meaning as used in Section 44203.

(b) “Regionally accredited” has the same meaning as used in Section 44203.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 27.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44421.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall privately admonish, publicly reprove, revoke or suspend for immoral or unprofessional conduct, or for persistent defiance of, and refusal to obey, the laws regulating the duties of persons serving in the public school system, or for any cause that would have warranted the denial of an application for a credential or the renewal thereof, or for evident unfitness for service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 7.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44421.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 44421, the commission shall take an appropriate adverse action on any credential holder who knowingly and willfully uses school records of pupil data in connection with, or implicitly or explicitly attempts to recruit a pupil to be a customer for, any business owned by the credential holder or in which the credential holder is an employee.

(b) The commission shall investigate allegations brought under this section in accordance with Section 44242.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44421.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 44421, the commission shall take an appropriate adverse action on any credential holder who knowingly and willfully reports false fiscal expenditure data relative to the conduct of any educational program.

(b) The commission shall investigate allegations brought under this section in accordance with Section 44242.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44422.

Whenever the holder of a credential issued by the State Board of Education or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing is charged with immoral or unprofessional conduct or evident unfitness for service or persistent defiance of, and refusal to obey, the laws regulating the duties of his or her position, the commission in its discretion after notifying the person charged of its intention to do so, may require the county board of education of the county in which he or she is serving or has last served to give notice of, and conduct, a hearing of the charges in the manner prescribed by law for the hearing of charges for private admonition, or for the revocation or suspension of a certificate by a county board of education.

The county board of education, after the hearing,
 shall report to the commission its findings, and a summary of the evidence, and shall make a definite recommendation concerning the revocation or suspension of the credential.

Upon receipt of a copy of the findings, summary of evidence, and recommendation, the commission may privately admonish the holder of the credential, or suspend or revoke the credential for the causes stated, or order the charges dismissed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 8.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44423.

(a) Whenever the holder of any credential issued by the commission requests in writing that the credential held by him or her be revoked, the commission shall revoke the credential.

(b) Notwithstanding a revocation pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall retain its authority to act under subdivision (b) of Section 44440.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44423.5.

(a) The commission shall suspend the credential of a holder when it receives notice that another state has taken final action to revoke a credential or license authorizing the holder of the credential to perform any duty in the public schools of another state. The suspension shall not take effect until the commission verifies by reviewing documents as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 44242.5 that the underlying acts of misconduct in the other state could result in a revocation of a credential in this state. The suspension shall remain in effect until the commission takes final action on a recommendation of the Committee of Credentials following a review in accordance with Sections 44242.5, 44242.7, 44244, 44244.1, and 44245.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to require the commission to revoke the credential of an individual whose credential has been suspended pursuant to subdivision (a). The commission shall exercise its independent judgment in making a decision in each case.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44423.6.

(a) (1) The commission shall revoke the credential of a holder when it receives notice that the ability of the holder of the credential to associate with minors has been limited as a term or condition of probation or sentencing resulting from a criminal conviction in this state, another state, or the United States. The limitation shall include, but is not limited to, a prohibition of associating or contact with minors, or a prohibition of associating with minors unless under supervision or in the presence of another adult.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a conviction based solely on violating an order as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 273.6 of the Penal Code.

(b) The commission shall revoke the credential of a holder upon receipt of notice that the holder of the credential has been ordered to surrender a credential or certification document as a term or condition of probation or sentencing resulting from a criminal conviction in this state, another state, or the United States. The limitation shall include, but not be limited to, an order to surrender or self revoke a credential authorizing service in a public school.

(c) A person whose credential is revoked pursuant to this section shall not apply to the commission for reinstatement of the credential pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code until the terms or conditions imposed by the conviction, as described in subdivision (a) or (b) of this section, are lifted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 578, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44424.

(a) Upon the conviction of the holder of any credential issued by the State Board of Education or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing of a violation, or attempted violation, of a violent or serious felony as described in Section 44346.1, or any one or more of Penal Code Sections 187 to 191, inclusive, 192 insofar as this section relates to voluntary manslaughter, 193, 194 to 217.1, inclusive, 220, 222, 244, 245, 261 to 267, inclusive, 273a, 273ab, 273d, 273f, 273g, 278, 285 to 288.7, inclusive, former Penal Code Section 288a, Penal Code Sections 424, 425, 484 to 488, inclusive, insofar as these sections relate to
 felony convictions, 503 and 504, or of any offense involving lewd and lascivious conduct under Section 272 of the Penal Code, or any offense committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws of the United States which, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punished as one or more of the offenses specified in this section, becoming final, the commission shall revoke the credential.

(b) Upon a plea of nolo contendere as a misdemeanor to one or more of the crimes set forth in subdivision (a), all credentials held by the respondent shall be suspended until a final disposition regarding those credentials is made by the commission. Any action that the commission is permitted to take following a conviction may be taken
 after the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence and the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(c) The commission shall revoke a credential issued to a person whose employment has been denied or terminated pursuant to Section 44830.1.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a credential shall not be revoked solely on the basis that the applicant or holder has been convicted of a violent or serious felony if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with
 Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 11.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44425.

(a) Whenever the holder of a credential issued by the state board or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing has been convicted of a sex offense, as defined in Section 44010, or controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011, the commission immediately shall suspend the credential. If the conviction is reversed and the holder is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges against him or her are dismissed, the commission immediately shall terminate the suspension of the credential. When the conviction becomes final or when imposition of sentence is suspended, the commission immediately shall revoke the credential.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Section 44009, if the holder of a credential enters a plea of nolo contendere for a violation of subdivision (d) of Section 647 of the Penal Code, the commission of a sex offense as defined in Section 44010, all credentials held by the individual shall be suspended until a final disposition regarding those credentials is made by the commission. Any action that the commission is permitted to take following a conviction may be taken after the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been confirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence and the time of appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, irrespective of a subsequent order pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(2) The Legislature shall convene a working group of interested parties including, but not limited to, the commission, civil rights organizations, and organizations that represent teachers, administrators, county offices of education, school districts, school boards, and parents to study Sections 44010, 44011, and 44424, and to provide a report on its findings on or before December 1, 2009.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, revocation shall be final without possibility of reinstatement of the credential if the conviction is for a felony sex offense, as defined in Section 44010, or a felony controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011, in which an element of the controlled substance offense is either the distribution to, or use of a controlled substance by, a minor.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission immediately shall suspend the credential of any holder who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to either of the following:

(A) Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(B) A law of any other state or of the United States when the underlying offense, if committed in this state, would require registration as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(2) If the conviction requiring registration as a sex offender is reversed on appeal and the holder is acquitted at a new trial or if the charges against the holder are dismissed as a result of the reversal, upon notice, the commission shall immediately reinstate the credential.

(3) The commission immediately shall revoke a credential based on a conviction requiring registration as a sex offender when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence and the time for appeal has elapsed.

(e) A credential holder whose credential has not been revoked pursuant to subdivision (a) as a result of a misdemeanor sex offense, as defined in Section 44010, that does not require registration as a sex offender as set forth in subdivision (c), may apply for reinstatement of his or her credential pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code if the accusation or information against the holder has been dismissed and he or she has been released from all disabilities and penalties resulting from the offense pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code or the equivalent statute in another federal or state jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 577, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44425.5.

Whenever the holder of any credential issued by the State Board of Education or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing is found to be insane, by a federal court or a court in this or any other state, the commission shall immediately revoke all credentials held by the person.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, revocation shall be final without possibility of reinstatement of the credentials if the holder of the credential is charged with a felony sex offense, as defined in Section 44010, a felony controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011, in which an element of the controlled substance offense is either the distribution to, or use of a controlled substance by, a minor, or murder, as defined in Section 187 of the Penal Code, and, in response to the charge, the holder of the credential is found to be insane through a criminal proceeding by a federal court or a court in this or any other state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

44426.

Whenever the holder of a credential issued by the State Board of Education or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing has been determined to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or under similar provisions of law of any other state, the commission shall forthwith suspend the credential. If the determination is reversed and the holder is determined not be a sexual psychopath in a new proceeding or the proceeding to determine whether he or she is a sexual psychopath is dismissed, the commission shall forthwith terminate the suspension of the credential. When the determination becomes final, the commission shall forthwith revoke the credential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 9.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44427.

County boards of education may revoke or suspend, for immoral or unprofessional conduct, evident unfitness for teaching, or persistent defiance of, and refusal to obey the laws regulating the duties of, teachers, the certificates granted by them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44428.

No certificate shall be revoked or suspended, except upon the written request of its holder, until after a hearing before the county board of education, and then only upon the affirmative vote of at least four members of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44429.

All charges of immoral or unprofessional conduct, of evident unfitness for teaching, or persistent defiance of, and refusal to obey the laws regulating the duties of teachers, shall be presented to the board in writing and shall be verified under oath.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44430.

Notice of the time of hearing and a full and complete copy of the charges shall be furnished to the accused at least 10 days before the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44431.

The accused shall be given a fair and impartial hearing and shall have the right to be represented by counsel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44432.

The hearing shall be governed by and conducted under the rules of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44433.

If any teacher employed by a board of school trustees for a specified time, leaves the school before the expiration of the time, without the consent of the trustees, in writing, the teacher is guilty of unprofessional conduct, and the board of education of the county, upon receiving notice of the fact, may suspend the certificate of the teacher for the period of one year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44434.

Each city or city and county board of examination may for immoral and unprofessional conduct, profanity, intemperance, or evident unfitness for teaching, recommend to the city or city and county board of education, the revocation of any certificate previously granted by the board of education in the city or city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44435.

Upon the becoming final of the conviction of the holder of a certificate issued by a county board of education of a violation or attempted violation of any one or more of Penal Code Sections 187 to 191, 192 insofar as that section relates to voluntary manslaughter, 193, 194 to 232, inclusive, 244, 245, 261 to 267, inclusive, 273a, 273f, 273g, 278, 285 to 288.7, both inclusive, former Penal Code Section 288a, Penal Code Sections 424, 425, 484 to 488, both inclusive,
 insofar as those sections relate to grand theft, 503 and 504, or of Penal Code Section 272, the county board of education shall revoke the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 12.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44436.

Whenever the holder of a certificate issued by a county board of education has been convicted of any sex offense as defined in Section 44010 or controlled substance offense as defined in Section 44011, the county board of education shall forthwith suspend the certificate. If the conviction is reversed and the holder is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges against him or her are dismissed, the board shall forthwith terminate the suspension of the certificate. When the conviction becomes final or when imposition of sentence is suspended, the board shall forthwith revoke the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

44437.

Whenever the holder of a certificate issued by a county board of education has been determined to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300), Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or under similar provisions of law of any other state, the county board of education shall forthwith suspend the certificate. If the determination is reversed and the holder is determined not to be a sexual psychopath in a new proceeding or the proceeding to determine whether he is a sexual psychopath is dismissed, the board shall forthwith terminate the suspension of the certificate. When the determination becomes final, the board shall forthwith revoke the certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44438.

(a) “Private admonition,” as used in this article and in Article 3 (commencing with Section 44240) of Chapter 2, is a warning, in writing, to the applicant or credentialholder that states in ordinary and concise language the act or omission of the applicant or credentialholder and further states that repetition of that act or omission may result in denial, suspension, or revocation of the credential.

(b) The private admonition shall be included in the applicant’s or credential holder’s file, maintained by the commission.

(c) The applicant’s or credentialholder’s employer at the time of
 admonition shall receive a copy of the admonition and shall not make that copy accessible or disclose the contents thereof, unless the applicant or credentialholder consents, in writing, thereto.

(d) For purposes of Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, the private admonition is deemed a personnel record within the meaning of Section 7927.700 of the Government Code.

(e) The commission and the applicant’s or credentialholder’s employer shall expunge all records pertaining to the private admonition maintained in the applicant’s or credentialholder’s files pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) at the expiration of three years, so long as there is no recurrence of the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 68.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

44439.

The commission may take an adverse action on the ground that an applicant or credential holder has subverted or attempted to subvert any licensing examination or the administration of an examination, including, but not limited to:

(a) Conduct that violates the security of the examination materials; removing from the examination room any examination materials; the unauthorized xerographic, photographic, or other mechanical reproduction of any portion of the actual licensing examination; aiding by any means the unauthorized xerographic, photographic, or other mechanical reproduction of any portion of the actual licensing examination; paying or using professional or paid examination-takers for the purpose of reconstructing any portion of the licensing examination; obtaining examination questions or other examination material, except by specific authorization either before, during, or after an examination or use or purport to use any examination questions or materials which were improperly removed or taken from any examination for the purpose of instructing or preparing applicants for examinations; or selling, distributing, buying, receiving or having unauthorized possession of any portion of a future, current, or previously administered licensing examination.

(b) Conduct that violates the standard of examination administration; communicating with any other examinee during the administration of a licensing examination; copying answers from another examinee or permitting one’s answers to be copied by another examinee; having in one’s possession during the administration of the licensing examination any books, equipment, notes, written or printed materials, or data of any kind, other than the examination materials distributed, or otherwise authorized to be in one’s possession during the examination; or impersonating any examinee or having an impersonator take the licensing examination on one’s behalf.

(c) The commission shall investigate allegations brought under this section in accordance with Section 44242.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44440.

(a) No applicant who is under review by the commission shall be allowed to withdraw his or her application for a credential without the written consent of the commission. The commission shall retain its authority over those applicants to proceed with the denial of the credential upon any ground provided by law, or to enter an order denying the credential upon any ground provided by law.

(b) The suspension or expiration of any credential, its surrender without the written consent of the commission, or a revocation pursuant to Section 44423 does not deprive the commission of its authority to do any of the following:

(1) Institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the credential holder upon any ground provided by law.

(2) Enter an order suspending or revoking the credential.

(3) Issue a public reproval or private admonition to the credential holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Teacher Education Internship Act of 1967 [44450. - 44468.]

44450.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Teacher Education Internship Act of 1967.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44451.

The intent of the Legislature in enacting this article is to increase the effectiveness of teachers and other professional school service personnel in the public schools of California by placing theory and practice as closely together as possible in college and university programs for the preparation of teachers and professional school service personnel. The Teacher Education Internship Act of 1967 is enacted to encourage the development and maintenance of preparation programs that are realistic and practical in content and theory and are directly related to the individual functions and responsibilities practitioners in the public schools of California face. The desirability of joining theory and practice during the learning period has been demonstrated amply in teaching internship programs during the past several years both within and without the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44452.

Any school district may, in cooperation with an approved college or university, establish a teacher education internship program as provided in Section 44321, and meeting the provisions of the statutes and of the regulations of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44453.

(a) For admission to all teaching internship programs authorized by this article, an applicant shall have a baccalaureate or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education and shall pass a subject matter examination as provided in Section 44280 or complete a commission-approved subject matter program as provided in Section 44310.

(b) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall ensure that each university internship program in California provides program elements to its interns as required by the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 28.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44454.

An internship credential authorizes the same service at the same levels as the regular credential authorizes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44455.

An internship credential shall be issued initially for a two-year period and may be renewed by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44456.

Notwithstanding Section 44455, an internship credential may be renewed by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing if in its judgment an applicant is unable to complete renewal requirements because of illness or other circumstances judged to be extenuating and not within the control of the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44457.

Prior to enrollment in any college or university preparation program to renew the internship credential, appropriate personnel in the employing school district shall counsel with the intern and a total program for the first and subsequent renewals shall be planned. The county superintendent of schools shall be involved in the program planning in the case of joint recommendations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44458.

The program shall meet the instructional or service needs of the district with the primary objective being to increase the effectiveness of the intern in the district. Both the district and the intern shall concur in the program planned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44459.

The full cooperation of colleges and universities is essential if teaching and service internship programs are to be successful. A school district establishing an internship program shall seek the cooperation of public and private colleges and universities, especially those within the geographic service area of the district for the establishment of courses and classes necessary for renewal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44460.

The intern shall have the right to attend any regionally accredited institution of higher education of the intern’s choice for the completion of renewal requirements. The success of internship programs will lie in the development of integrated, well-organized, and sequential programs of study by cooperating colleges and universities. When appropriate and feasible, colleges and universities may provide off-campus programs of study for interns within the geographic area of their employing school districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 29.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44461.

The supervisory help and guidance of interns as they pursue their school district responsibilities are important for the success of such programs. The utilization of competent and qualified college and university staff members for this purpose is encouraged. To help achieve this end, school districts, and county superintendents of schools in the case of joint recommendations, may enter into agreements with colleges and universities for the employment of staff for such supervision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44462.

Salary payments for supervision of interns may be made out of district funds and may be met by reducing proportionately the salaries paid interns. Under this authorization no more than eight interns may be supervised by one staff member and the normal district salary paid each intern may be reduced by as much as, but no more than, one-eighth to pay the salary of the supervisor. In no event may an intern be paid less than the minimum salary required to be paid by the state to a regularly certificated teacher.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44463.

An intern shall have the right to change school districts upon completion of a school contract year and become an intern in a new school district if recommended by the new school district. A new application recommending issuance of a new internship credential shall be submitted by the school district in behalf of the individual and the renewal procedures shall be followed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44464.

An internship credential shall be valid only as long as the holder is in good standing in the teacher internship program of the district that makes the request, notwithstanding any provision of Section 44463, and the rights provided by Sections 44948 and 44949 shall not be afforded to interns.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44465.

A school district shall give special supervision and assistance to each intern above and beyond that given to other newly certificated and newly employed school personnel. A school district shall seek the assistance of the college or university in coordinating the program for the intern.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44466.

An intern shall not acquire tenure while serving on an internship credential. A person who, after completing a teaching internship program authorized pursuant to this article, is employed for at least one complete school year in a position requiring certification qualifications by the school district that employed the person as an intern during the immediately preceding school year and is reelected for the next succeeding school year to a position requiring certification qualifications shall, at the commencement of the succeeding school year, acquire tenure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

44467.

Colleges and universities may continue the development and maintenance of internship credential programs under their own auspices seeking the cooperation of school districts in their full implementation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44468.

(a) An internship program, established pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325) of Chapter 2 or this article, that is accredited by the commission shall provide interns who meet entrance criteria and are accepted to a multiple subject teaching credential program, a PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential program, a single subject teaching credential program, or an education specialist credential program that provides instruction to individuals with mild to moderate disabilities the opportunity to choose an early program completion option, culminating in a five-year preliminary teaching credential. The early program completion option shall be made available to interns who meet the following requirements:

(1) Pass a written assessment that
 assesses knowledge of teaching foundations, is adopted for this purpose by the commission, and includes all of the following:

(A) Human development as it relates to teaching and learning aligned with the state content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board.

(B) Techniques to address learning differences including working with pupils with special needs.

(C) Techniques to address working with English learners to provide access to the curriculum.

(D) Reading instruction as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(E) The assessment of pupil progress based upon the state content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board and
 planning intervention based on the assessment.

(F) Classroom management techniques.

(G) Methods of teaching the subject fields.

(2) (A) Pass the teaching performance assessment as set forth in Section 44320.2.

(B) An intern participating in the early completion option may take the teaching performance assessment only one time as part of the early completion option. An intern who takes the teaching performance assessment but is not successful may complete the internship program. Scores on this assessment shall be used by the internship program in providing the individualized professional development plan for interns that emphasizes preparation in areas where additional growth is warranted and waiving preparation in areas where the
 candidate has demonstrated competence. The intern shall retake and pass the teaching performance assessment at the end of the internship in order to be considered for recommendation by the internship program to the commission.

(3) Until the commission ensures that an approved teaching performance assessment for a preliminary multiple subject credential, for a preliminary PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential, and for a preliminary education specialist credential assesses candidates for competence in instruction in literacy, as specified in Sections 44320.2 and 44320.3, as applicable, successfully pass a reading instruction competence assessment required by Section 44283, if required for the intern’s credential.

(4) Meet the requirements for teacher fitness as set forth in Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(b) An intern who elects to use the early completion option must first pass the assessment required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) in order to qualify to take the teaching performance assessment required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) An intern who passes the assessments described in subdivision (a) and is recommended by the internship program to the commission is eligible for a five-year preliminary multiple subject teaching credential, single subject teaching credential, PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential, or education specialist credential that authorizes instruction to individuals with mild to moderate disabilities.

(d) The commission shall issue a clear multiple subject teaching credential, a clear PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential, a clear education specialist credential, or single subject
 teaching credential to an applicant whose employing school district documents, in a manner prescribed by the commission, that the applicant has fulfilled both of the following requirements:

(1) Holds a preliminary five-year teaching credential issued by the commission.

(2) Completes a commission-approved teacher induction program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 38.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.1. Standards for Professional Development [44470. - 44472.]

44470.

(a) (1) The State Department of Education shall issue a request for proposals to contract for the development of standards for professional development for educators and instructional leaders.

(2) The standards shall present a vision of ongoing, high quality professional development, give special attention to high need schools and school districts, and build on existing work on quality professional development, including the Designs for Learning system.

(3) The contractor shall also review and give consideration to other existing professional development programs.

(4) The standards shall serve as guidelines for providers of professional development activities and may be used to facilitate the coordination among existing professional development programs.
